Nebraska, session 109, LB509.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 13 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Opportunity Scholarships Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that:
(1) Enabling the greatest number of parents and legal guardians to
choose among quality educational opportunities for children will improve
the quality of education available to all children;
(2) Privately operated elementary and secondary schools in Nebraska
satisfy the state's requirements for legal operation and provide quality
educational opportunities for children;
(3) Parents and legal guardians of limited means are less able to
choose among quality educational opportunities for their children;
(4) Making it possible for more parents and legal guardians to be
able to choose privately operated schools benefits Nebraska parents and
taxpayers; and
(5) It is in the best interests of the State of Nebraska and its
citizens to encourage individuals and businesses to support organizations
that financially assist parents and legal guardians who want to enroll
their children in privately operated elementary and secondary schools,
and such encouragement can be accomplished through the use of tax
credits.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Opportunity Scholarships Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(2) Education scholarship means a financial grant-in-aid to be used
to pay all or part of the cost to educate an eligible student attending a
qualified school;
(3) Eligible student means a resident of Nebraska who:
(a) Is receiving an education scholarship for the first time and is
(i) entering kindergarten or ninth grade in a qualified school or the
first grade level offered by the qualified school, (ii) transferring from
a public school or exempt school at which the student was enrolled for at
least one semester immediately preceding the first semester for which the
-2-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
student receives an education scholarship to a qualified school and is
entering any of grades kindergarten through twelve, or (iii) a member of
an active duty or reserve military family transferring into Nebraska from
another state or another country and is entering any of grades
kindergarten through twelve in a qualified school;
(b) Has previously received an education scholarship under the
Opportunity Scholarships Act and is continuing education at a qualified
school until such student graduates from high school or reaches twenty-
one years of age, whichever comes first;
(c) Has previously received an education scholarship under sections
77-7101 to 77-7113 or section 79-1608, as such sections existed prior to
their repeal, and is continuing education at a qualified school until
such student graduates from high school or reaches twenty-one years of
age, whichever comes first;
(d) Is the sibling of a student who is receiving an education
scholarship and resides in the same household as such student; or
(e) Is currently enrolled in a qualified school and is a member of a
family whose household income is no more than two hundred thirteen
percent of the federal poverty level;
(4) Qualified school means any nongovernmental, privately operated
elementary or secondary school located in this state that (a) is operated
not for profit, (b) complies with the antidiscrimination provisions of 42
U.S.C. 1981, as such section existed on January 1, 2025, (c) complies
with all health and life safety laws or codes that apply to privately
operated schools, and (d) fulfills the applicable accreditation or
approval requirements established by the State Board of Education
pursuant to section 79-318; and
(5) Scholarship-granting organization means a charitable
organization in this state (a) that is exempt from federal income
taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, (b) that is certified pursuant to section 4 of this act
-3-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
to provide tax-credit-supported education scholarships to eligible
students to assist them in attending qualified schools, and (c) whose
primary purpose is the distribution of scholarships to eligible students.
Sec. 4. (1) An organization may apply to the department to become
certified as a scholarship-granting organization under the Opportunity
Scholarships Act. An organization shall obtain such certification prior
to providing any education scholarships to eligible students under the
act. The applicant shall provide the department with sufficient
information to show:
(a) That the applicant is exempt from federal income taxation under
section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(b) That the applicant will offer one or more education scholarship
programs for eligible students;
(c) That the applicant will be able to comply with the requirements
of section 10 of this act;
(d) That the applicant will provide education scholarships for
eligible students without limiting education scholarship availability to
only one qualified school;
(e) That the applicant will:
(i) Give first priority to:
(A) Eligible students who received an education scholarship under
the Opportunity Scholarships Act during the previous school year or
received an education scholarship under sections 77-7101 to 77-7113 or
section 79-1608, as such sections existed prior to their repeal; and
(B) The sibling of a student who is receiving an education
scholarship, so long as the sibling resides in the same household as such
student;
(ii) Give second priority to:
(A) Eligible students whose household income levels do not exceed
one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level;
(B) Eligible students whose application for the enrollment option
-4-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
program established in section 79-234 has been denied;
(C) Eligible students who have a special education plan outlining
the eligible student's learning needs and how they will receive
specialized instruction and support services;
(D) Eligible students who are experiencing bullying, harassment,
hazing, assault, battery, kidnapping, robbery, sexual offenses, threat or
intimidation, or fighting at school;
(E) Eligible students who are in foster care; and
(F) Eligible students who are in a family with a parent or guardian
in an active-duty role in a branch of the armed forces of the United
States or in the National Guard, or whose parent or guardian was killed
serving in the line of duty;
(iii) Give third priority to eligible students whose household
income levels exceed one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal
poverty level but do not exceed two hundred thirteen percent of the
federal poverty level; and
(iv) Give fourth priority to eligible students whose household
income levels exceed two hundred thirteen percent of the federal poverty
level but do not exceed three hundred percent of the income indicated in
the income eligibility guidelines for reduced price meals under the
National School Lunch Program in 7 C.F.R. part 210;
(f) That the applicant will limit the maximum scholarship amount
awarded to any student to the cost to educate an eligible student at a
qualified school; and
(g) That the applicant will limit scholarship amounts awarded to
students in a manner that assures that the average of the scholarship
amounts awarded per student does not exceed seventy-five percent of the
statewide average general fund operating expenditures per formula student
for the most recently available complete data year as such terms are
defined in section 79-1003.
(2) If the applicant meets the requirements of this section, the
-5-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
department shall certify it as a scholarship-granting organization for
tax-credit purposes under the Opportunity Scholarships Act. Such
certification is subject to revocation by the department if the
scholarship-granting organization subsequently fails to fulfill the
requirements of this section or section 10 of this act.
Sec. 5. (1) An individual taxpayer who makes one or more cash
contributions to one or more scholarship-granting organizations during a
tax year shall be eligible for a credit against the income tax due under
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Except as otherwise provided in the
Opportunity Scholarships Act, the amount of the credit shall be equal to
whichever of the following amounts is the lowest: (a) The total amount of
such contributions made during the tax year; (b) fifty percent of the
income tax liability of such taxpayer for the tax year; or (c) one
hundred thousand dollars. A taxpayer may only claim a credit pursuant to
this section for the portion of the contribution that was not claimed as
a charitable contribution under the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) Taxpayers who are married but file separate returns for a tax
year in which they could have filed a joint return may each claim only
one-half of the tax credit that would otherwise have been allowed for a
joint return.
(3) The tax credit allowed under this section shall be a
nonrefundable credit. Any amount of the credit that is unused may be
carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's income tax liability
for the next five years immediately following the tax year in which the
credit is first allowed. The tax credit cannot be carried back.
(4) The taxpayer may not designate all or any part of the
contribution to a scholarship-granting organization for the benefit of
any eligible student specifically identified by the taxpayer.
(5) The tax credit allowed under this section is subject to section
9 of this act.
Sec. 6. (1) Any partnership, limited liability company, or
-6-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
corporation having an election in effect under subchapter S of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, that is carrying on any trade
or business for which deductions would be allowed under section 162 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or is carrying on any
rental activity and that makes one or more cash contributions to one or
more scholarship-granting organizations during a tax year shall be
eligible for a credit against the income tax due under the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967. Except as otherwise provided in the Opportunity
Scholarships Act, the amount of the credit shall be equal to whichever of
the following amounts is the lowest: (a) The total amount of such
contributions made during the tax year; (b) fifty percent of the income
tax liability of such taxpayer for the tax year; or (c) one hundred
thousand dollars. A taxpayer may only claim a credit pursuant to this
section for the portion of the contribution that was not claimed as a
charitable contribution under the Internal Revenue Code. The credit shall
be attributed to each partner, member, or shareholder in the same
proportion used to report the partnership's, limited liability company's,
or subchapter S corporation's income or loss for income tax purposes.
(2) The tax credit allowed under this section shall be a
nonrefundable credit. Any amount of the tax credit that is unused may be
carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's income tax liability
for the next five years immediately following the tax year in which the
credit is first allowed. The tax credit cannot be carried back.
(3) The taxpayer may not designate all or any part of the
contribution to a scholarship-granting organization for the benefit of
any eligible student specifically identified by the taxpayer.
(4) The tax credit allowed under this section is subject to section
9 of this act.
Sec. 7. (1) An estate or trust which makes one or more cash
contributions to one or more scholarship-granting organizations during a
tax year shall be eligible for a credit against the income tax due under
-7-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Except as otherwise provided in the
Opportunity Scholarships Act, the amount of the credit shall be equal to
whichever of the following amounts is the lowest: (a) The total amount of
such contributions made during the tax year; (b) fifty percent of the
income tax liability of such taxpayer for the tax year; or (c) one
million dollars. A taxpayer may only claim a credit pursuant to this
section for the portion of the contribution that was not claimed as a
charitable contribution under the Internal Revenue Code. Any credit not
used by the estate or trust may be attributed to each beneficiary of the
estate or trust in the same proportion used to report the beneficiary's
income from the estate or trust for income tax purposes.
(2) The tax credit allowed under this section shall be a
nonrefundable credit. Any amount of the tax credit that is unused may be
carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's income tax liability
for the next five years immediately following the tax year in which the
credit is first allowed. The tax credit cannot be carried back.
(3) The taxpayer may not designate all or any part of the
contribution to a scholarship-granting organization for the benefit of
any eligible student specifically identified by the taxpayer.
(4) The tax credit allowed under this section is subject to section
9 of this act.
Sec. 8. (1) A corporate taxpayer as defined in section 77-2734.04
which makes one or more cash contributions to one or more scholarship-
granting organizations during a tax year shall be eligible for a credit
against the income tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Except
as otherwise provided in the Opportunity Scholarships Act, the amount of
the credit shall be equal to whichever of the following amounts is the
lowest: (a) The total amount of such contributions made during the tax
year; (b) fifty percent of the income tax liability of such taxpayer for
the tax year; or (c) one hundred thousand dollars. A taxpayer may only
claim a credit pursuant to this section for the portion of the
-8-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
contribution that was not claimed as a charitable contribution under the
Internal Revenue Code.
(2) The tax credit allowed under this section shall be a
nonrefundable credit. Any amount of the tax credit that is unused may be
carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's income tax liability
for the next five years immediately following the tax year in which the
credit is first allowed. The tax credit cannot be carried back.
(3) The taxpayer may not designate all or any part of the
contribution to a scholarship-granting organization for the benefit of
any eligible student specifically identified by the taxpayer.
(4) The tax credit allowed under this section is subject to section
9 of this act.
Sec. 9. (1) Prior to making a contribution to a scholarship-
granting organization, any taxpayer desiring to claim a tax credit under
the Opportunity Scholarships Act shall notify the scholarship-granting
organization of the taxpayer's intent to make a contribution and the
amount to be claimed as a tax credit. Upon receiving each such
notification, the scholarship-granting organization shall notify the
department of the intended tax credit amount. If the department
determines that the intended tax credit amount in the notification would
exceed the limit specified in subsection (3) of this section, the
department shall notify the scholarship-granting organization of its
determination within thirty days after receipt of the notification. The
scholarship-granting organization shall then promptly notify the taxpayer
of the department's determination that the intended tax credit amount in
the notification is not available. If an amount less than the amount
indicated in the notification is available for a tax credit, the
department shall notify the scholarship-granting organization of the
available amount and the scholarship-granting organization shall notify
the taxpayer of the available amount within three business days.
(2) In order to be allowed a tax credit as provided by the act, the
-9-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
taxpayer shall make its contribution between thirty-one and sixty days
after notifying the scholarship-granting organization of the taxpayer's
intent to make a contribution. If the scholarship-granting organization
does not receive the contribution within the required time period, it
shall notify the department of such fact and the department shall no
longer include such amount when calculating whether the limit prescribed
in subsection (3) of this section has been exceeded. If the scholarship-
granting organization receives the contribution within the required time
period, it shall provide the taxpayer with a receipt for the
contribution. The receipt shall show the name and address of the
scholarship-granting organization, the date the scholarship-granting
organization was certified by the department in accordance with section 4
of this act, the name, address, and, if available, tax identification
number of the taxpayer making the contribution, the amount of the
contribution, and the date the contribution was received.
(3) The department shall consider notifications regarding intended
tax credit amounts in the order in which they are received to ascertain
whether the intended tax credit amounts are within the annual limit
provided in this subsection. The annual limit on the total amount of tax
credits for calendar years 2025, 2026, and 2027 shall be twenty-five
million dollars. The annual limit on the total amount of tax credits for
calendar year 2028 and each calendar year thereafter shall be calculated
by taking the annual limit from the prior calendar year and then
multiplying such amount by (a) one hundred twenty-five percent if the
intended tax credit amounts in the prior calendar year exceeded ninety
percent of the annual limit applicable to that calendar year or (b) one
hundred percent if the intended tax credit amounts in the prior calendar
year did not exceed ninety percent of the annual limit applicable to that
calendar year. The annual limit may be increased as provided in this
subsection until it reaches one hundred million dollars. Thereafter, no
further increases shall be allowed.
-10-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
(4) The State Department of Education and the Department of Revenue
shall publish on their respective websites information identifying the
annual limit when it is increased pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) Once credits have reached the designated annual limit for any
calendar year, no additional credits shall be allowed for such calendar
year. Credits shall be prorated among the notifications received on the
day the annual limit is exceeded.
Sec. 10. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Net revenue means the total amount of revenue received by a
scholarship-granting organization during a state fiscal year minus the
amount of such revenue that is used or reserved for the administrative
costs of such organization for the same state fiscal year;
(b) Revenue means all grants, donations, and contributions received
by a scholarship-granting organization for the purpose of providing
education scholarships; and
(c) State fiscal year means the period of time commencing on July 1
and ending on June 30 of the following year.
(2) In order for a scholarship-granting organization to remain
certified under the Opportunity Scholarships Act, the scholarship-
granting organization shall allocate at least ninety percent of its
revenue for education scholarships and no more than ten percent of its
revenue shall be used or reserved for administrative costs.
(3) For purposes of subsection (2) of this section, revenue is
allocated when it is expended or otherwise irrevocably encumbered for
expenditure. The percentage of revenue allocated for education
scholarships shall be measured as a monthly average over the most recent
twenty-four-month period or, for a scholarship-granting organization that
has been certified for less than twenty-four months, over the period of
time that the scholarship-granting organization has been certified.
(4) Beginning January 1, 2028:
-11-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
(a) A scholarship-granting organization shall carry forward no more
than twenty-five percent of its net revenue from one state fiscal year to
the following state fiscal year. Any amount carried forward shall be
expended for annual or partial-year education scholarships in the
following state fiscal year; and
(b) Any amount of net revenue remaining on June 30 of any state
fiscal year that is in excess of the amount that may be carried forward
under subdivision (a) of this subsection shall be used to provide
education scholarships to eligible students or transferred to one or more
other scholarship-granting organizations to provide education
scholarships to eligible students by no later than the following
September 30. Any amount of such net revenue that is not used or
transferred by the following September 30 shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the General Fund. Any scholarship-granting
organization receiving a transfer pursuant to this subdivision shall
place the transferred funds into its scholarship account and shall
separately disclose the transfer in its annual financial audit.
Sec. 11. (1) Each scholarship-granting organization shall annually
submit to the department no later than December 1 of each year a
financial report showing how tax credits were used for the most recently
completed school year.
(2) Each scholarship-granting organization shall include with the
report submitted under subsection (1) of this section a summary
description of (a) its policies and procedures for awarding education
scholarships, (b) the number of eligible students receiving education
scholarships in the most recent fiscal year, (c) the total amount of
contributions received for education scholarships in the most recent
fiscal year, and (d) the total amount of education scholarships awarded
in the most recent fiscal year.
(3) The department shall electronically forward such reports and
summary descriptions to the Governor and the Legislature no later than
-12-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
December 31 of each year.
(4) By June 30, 2027, and by June 30 of each odd-numbered year
thereafter, the department shall electronically submit a report to the
chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, the
chairperson of the Education Committee of the Legislature, and the
chairperson of the Revenue Committee of the Legislature. The report shall
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(a) A review of the progress of the Opportunity Scholarships Act;
(b) The number of students currently wait-listed or denied from
receiving an education scholarship and the reason for the wait-listing or
denial;
(c) The dollar amount of education scholarships given by
scholarship-granting organizations; and
(d) The demographic information of students receiving education
scholarships, including, but not limited to:
(i) Income level;
(ii) Grade level; and
(iii) Geographic location.
Sec. 12. The Opportunity Scholarships Act shall not be construed as
granting any expanded or additional authority to the State of Nebraska to
control or influence the governance or policies of any qualified school
due to the fact that the qualified school admits and enrolls students who
receive education scholarships or as requiring any such qualified school
to admit or, once admitted, to continue the enrollment of any student
receiving an education scholarship.
Sec. 13. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Opportunity Scholarships Act.
Sec. 14. Section 77-2715.07, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2715.07 (1) There shall be allowed to qualified resident
individuals as a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by
-13-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit equal to the federal credit allowed under section 22 of
the Internal Revenue Code; and
(b) A credit for taxes paid to another state as provided in section
77-2730.
(2) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross incomes of
greater than twenty-nine thousand dollars, a nonrefundable credit equal
to twenty-five percent of the federal credit allowed under section 21 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except that for taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2015, such
nonrefundable credit shall be allowed only if the individual would have
received the federal credit allowed under section 21 of the code after
adding back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was deducted
pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for the federal
credit;
(b) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross income of
twenty-nine thousand dollars or less, a refundable credit equal to a
percentage of the federal credit allowable under section 21 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, whether or not the federal
credit was limited by the federal tax liability. The percentage of the
federal credit shall be one hundred percent for incomes not greater than
twenty-two thousand dollars, and the percentage shall be reduced by ten
percent for each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
reported federal adjusted gross income exceeds twenty-two thousand
dollars, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if
the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 21 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net
operating loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining
-14-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
eligibility for the federal credit;
(c) A refundable credit as provided in section 77-5209.01 for
individuals who qualify for an income tax credit as a qualified beginning
farmer or livestock producer under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act
for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2006, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(d) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income
tax credit under the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research
and Development Act, the Reverse Osmosis System Tax Credit Act, or the
Volunteer Emergency Responders Incentive Act; and
(e) A refundable credit equal to ten percent of the federal credit
allowed under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if
the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 32 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net
operating loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining
eligibility for the federal credit.
(3) There shall be allowed to all individuals as a nonrefundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967:
(a) A credit for personal exemptions allowed under section
77-2716.01;
(b) A credit for contributions to programs or projects certified for
tax credit status as provided in the Creating High Impact Economic
Futures Act. Each partner, each shareholder of an electing subchapter S
corporation, each beneficiary of an estate or trust, or each member of a
limited liability company shall report his or her share of the credit in
the same manner and proportion as he or she reports the partnership,
subchapter S corporation, estate, trust, or limited liability company
-15-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
income;
(c) A credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in
section 77-27,236;
(d) A credit as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment
Act;
(e) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act;
(f) A credit to employers as provided in sections 77-27,238 and
77-27,240;
(g) A credit as provided in the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act;
(h) A credit to grocery store retailers, restaurants, and
agricultural producers as provided in section 77-27,241;
(i) A credit as provided in the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit
Act;
(j) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Shortline Rail
Modernization Act;
(k) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act; and
(l) A credit as provided in the Caregiver Tax Credit Act; and .
(m) A credit as provided in the Opportunity Scholarships Act.
(4) There shall be allowed as a credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit to all resident estates and trusts for taxes paid to
another state as provided in section 77-2730;
(b) A credit to all estates and trusts for contributions to programs
or projects certified for tax credit status as provided in the Creating
High Impact Economic Futures Act; and
(c) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income
tax credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer
Tax Credit Act for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended. The credit allowed for each partner, shareholder, member, or
-16-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
beneficiary of a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or
estate or trust qualifying for an income tax credit as an owner of
agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act shall be
equal to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion
of the amount of tax credit distributed pursuant to subsection (6) of
section 77-5211.
(5)(a) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007,
and before January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, there shall be allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or
beneficiary of a partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability
company, or estate or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal to fifty percent of the
partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion of the
amount of franchise tax paid to the state under sections 77-3801 to
77-3807 by a financial institution.
(b) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there shall be
allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a
partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or
estate or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal to the partner's, shareholder's,
member's, or beneficiary's portion of the amount of franchise tax paid to
the state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by a financial institution.
(c) Each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary shall report
his or her share of the credit in the same manner and proportion as he or
she reports the partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability
company, or estate or trust income. If any partner, shareholder, member,
or beneficiary cannot fully utilize the credit for that year, the credit
may not be carried forward or back.
(6) There shall be allowed to all individuals nonrefundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
-17-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
provided in section 77-3604 and refundable credits against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section
77-3605.
(7)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, a nonrefundable credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in the amount of five
thousand dollars shall be allowed to any individual who purchases a
residence during the taxable year if such residence:
(i) Is located within an area that has been declared an extremely
blighted area under section 18-2101.02;
(ii) Is the individual's primary residence; and
(iii) Was not purchased from a family member of the individual or a
family member of the individual's spouse.
(b) The credit provided in this subsection shall be claimed for the
taxable year in which the residence is purchased. If the individual
cannot fully utilize the credit for such year, the credit may be carried
forward to subsequent taxable years until fully utilized.
(c) No more than one credit may be claimed under this subsection
with respect to a single residence.
(d) The credit provided in this subsection shall be subject to
recapture by the Department of Revenue if the individual claiming the
credit sells or otherwise transfers the residence or quits using the
residence as his or her primary residence within five years after the end
of the taxable year in which the credit was claimed.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, family member means an
individual's spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or
grandparent, whether by blood, marriage, or adoption.
(8) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax
-18-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
Credit Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Property Tax Incentive Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, and the
Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act.
(9)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a
refundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 shall be allowed to the parent of a stillborn child if:
(i) A fetal death certificate is filed pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 71-606 for such child;
(ii) Such child had advanced to at least the twentieth week of
gestation; and
(iii) Such child would have been a dependent of the individual
claiming the credit.
(b) The amount of the credit shall be two thousand dollars.
(c) The credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the
stillbirth occurred.
(10) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-7203 and nonrefundable credits against the income
tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section
77-7204.
(11) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-3157 and nonrefundable credits against the income
tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in sections
77-3156, 77-3158, and 77-3159.
Sec. 15. Section 77-2717, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2717 (1)(a)(i) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
before January 1, 2014, the tax imposed on all resident estates and
trusts shall be a percentage of the federal taxable income of such
-19-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
estates and trusts as modified in section 77-2716, plus a percentage of
the federal alternative minimum tax and the federal tax on premature or
lump-sum distributions from qualified retirement plans. The additional
taxes shall be recomputed by (A) substituting Nebraska taxable income for
federal taxable income, (B) calculating what the federal alternative
minimum tax would be on Nebraska taxable income and adjusting such
calculations for any items which are reflected differently in the
determination of federal taxable income, and (C) applying Nebraska rates
to the result. The federal credit for prior year minimum tax, after the
recomputations required by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, and the
credits provided in the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act
and the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act shall be allowed
as a reduction in the income tax due. A refundable income tax credit
shall be allowed for all resident estates and trusts under the Angel
Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax
Credit Act, and the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act. A
nonrefundable income tax credit shall be allowed for all resident estates
and trusts as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act.
(ii) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2014, the tax imposed on all resident estates and trusts shall
be a percentage of the federal taxable income of such estates and trusts
as modified in section 77-2716, plus a percentage of the federal tax on
premature or lump-sum distributions from qualified retirement plans. The
additional taxes shall be recomputed by substituting Nebraska taxable
income for federal taxable income and applying Nebraska rates to the
result. The credits provided in the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise
Tax Credit Act and the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act
shall be allowed as a reduction in the income tax due. A refundable
income tax credit shall be allowed for all resident estates and trusts
under the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska
Act, the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
-20-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
Advantage Research and Development Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit
Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax
Incentive Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical
Production Tax Credit Act. A nonrefundable income tax credit shall be
allowed for all resident estates and trusts as provided in the Nebraska
Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job
Growth Investment Act, the School Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child
Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act, the
Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Shortline Rail
Modernization Act, the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with
Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities Support Act, the Opportunity
Scholarships Act, and sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and 77-27,241.
(b) The tax imposed on all nonresident estates and trusts shall be
the portion of the tax imposed on resident estates and trusts which is
attributable to the income derived from sources within this state. The
tax which is attributable to income derived from sources within this
state shall be determined by multiplying the liability to this state for
a resident estate or trust with the same total income by a fraction, the
numerator of which is the nonresident estate's or trust's Nebraska income
as determined by sections 77-2724 and 77-2725 and the denominator of
which is its total federal income after first adjusting each by the
amounts provided in section 77-2716. The federal credit for prior year
minimum tax, after the recomputations required by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, reduced by the percentage of the total income which is
attributable to income from sources outside this state, and the credits
provided in the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act and the
Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act shall be allowed as a
reduction in the income tax due. A refundable income tax credit shall be
allowed for all nonresident estates and trusts under the Angel Investment
Tax Credit Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Advantage
Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and
-21-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
Development Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical Production Tax
Credit Act. A nonrefundable income tax credit shall be allowed for all
nonresident estates and trusts as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation
and Mainstreet Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment
Act, the School Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act,
the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Nebraska
Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities Support Act, the Opportunity Scholarships Act, and sections
77-27,238, 77-27,240, and 77-27,241.
(2) In all instances wherein a fiduciary income tax return is
required under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, a Nebraska
fiduciary return shall be filed, except that a fiduciary return shall not
be required to be filed regarding a simple trust if all of the trust's
beneficiaries are residents of the State of Nebraska, all of the trust's
income is derived from sources in this state, and the trust has no
federal tax liability. The fiduciary shall be responsible for making the
return for the estate or trust for which he or she acts, whether the
income be taxable to the estate or trust or to the beneficiaries thereof.
The fiduciary shall include in the return a statement of each
beneficiary's distributive share of net income when such income is
taxable to such beneficiaries.
(3) The beneficiaries of such estate or trust who are residents of
this state shall include in their income their proportionate share of
such estate's or trust's federal income and shall reduce their Nebraska
tax liability by their proportionate share of the credits as provided in
the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage
Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and
Development Act, the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization
-22-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School Readiness Tax
Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable Housing Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Higher
Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit
Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Shortline
Rail Modernization Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska
Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities Support Act, the Opportunity Scholarships Act, and sections
77-27,238, 77-27,240, and 77-27,241. There shall be allowed to a
beneficiary a refundable income tax credit under the Beginning Farmer Tax
Credit Act for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2001, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) If any beneficiary of such estate or trust is a nonresident
during any part of the estate's or trust's taxable year, he or she shall
file a Nebraska income tax return which shall include (a) in Nebraska
adjusted gross income that portion of the estate's or trust's Nebraska
income, as determined under sections 77-2724 and 77-2725, allocable to
his or her interest in the estate or trust and (b) a reduction of the
Nebraska tax liability by his or her proportionate share of the credits
as provided in the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research
and Development Act, the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School
Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable
Housing Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the
Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive
Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, the Renewable Chemical Production Tax
Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the
Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and
-23-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
Developmental Disabilities Support Act, the Opportunity Scholarships Act,
and sections 77-27,238, 77-27,240, and 77-27,241 and shall execute and
forward to the fiduciary, on or before the original due date of the
Nebraska fiduciary return, an agreement which states that he or she will
file a Nebraska income tax return and pay income tax on all income
derived from or connected with sources in this state, and such agreement
shall be attached to the Nebraska fiduciary return for such taxable year.
(5) In the absence of the nonresident beneficiary's executed
agreement being attached to the Nebraska fiduciary return, the estate or
trust shall remit a portion of such beneficiary's income which was
derived from or attributable to Nebraska sources with its Nebraska return
for the taxable year. For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin
before January 1, 2013, the amount of remittance, in such instance, shall
be the highest individual income tax rate determined under section
77-2715.02 multiplied by the nonresident beneficiary's share of the
estate or trust income which was derived from or attributable to sources
within this state. For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2013, the amount of remittance, in such instance, shall
be the highest individual income tax rate determined under section
77-2715.03 multiplied by the nonresident beneficiary's share of the
estate or trust income which was derived from or attributable to sources
within this state. The amount remitted shall be allowed as a credit
against the Nebraska income tax liability of the beneficiary.
(6) The Tax Commissioner may allow a nonresident beneficiary to not
file a Nebraska income tax return if the nonresident beneficiary's only
source of Nebraska income was his or her share of the estate's or trust's
income which was derived from or attributable to sources within this
state, the nonresident did not file an agreement to file a Nebraska
income tax return, and the estate or trust has remitted the amount
required by subsection (5) of this section on behalf of such nonresident
beneficiary. The amount remitted shall be retained in satisfaction of the
-24-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
Nebraska income tax liability of the nonresident beneficiary.
(7) For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, simple trust shall mean any trust instrument which (a) requires
that all income shall be distributed currently to the beneficiaries, (b)
does not allow amounts to be paid, permanently set aside, or used in the
tax year for charitable purposes, and (c) does not distribute amounts
allocated in the corpus of the trust. Any trust which does not qualify as
a simple trust shall be deemed a complex trust.
(8) For purposes of this section, any beneficiary of an estate or
trust that is a grantor trust of a nonresident shall be disregarded and
this section shall apply as though the nonresident grantor was the
beneficiary.
Sec. 16. Section 77-2734.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2734.03 (1)(a) For taxable years commencing prior to January 1,
1997, any (i) insurer paying a tax on premiums and assessments pursuant
to section 77-908 or 81-523, (ii) electric cooperative organized under
the Joint Public Power Authority Act, or (iii) credit union shall be
credited, in the computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967, with the amount paid during the taxable year as taxes on
such premiums and assessments and taxes in lieu of intangible tax.
(b) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 1997, any
insurer paying a tax on premiums and assessments pursuant to section
77-908 or 81-523, any electric cooperative organized under the Joint
Public Power Authority Act, or any credit union shall be credited, in the
computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, with
the amount paid during the taxable year as (i) taxes on such premiums and
assessments included as Nebraska premiums and assessments under section
77-2734.05 and (ii) taxes in lieu of intangible tax.
(c) For taxable years commencing or deemed to commence prior to, on,
or after January 1, 1998, any insurer paying a tax on premiums and
-25-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
assessments pursuant to section 77-908 or 81-523 shall be credited, in
the computation of the tax due under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967,
with the amount paid during the taxable year as assessments allowed as an
offset against premium and related retaliatory tax liability pursuant to
section 44-4233.
(2) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a tax credit for
contributions to programs or projects certified for tax credit status as
provided in the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act.
(3) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a refundable
income tax credit under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act for all
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2001,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(4) The changes made to this section by Laws 2004, LB 983, apply to
motor fuels purchased during any tax year ending or deemed to end on or
after January 1, 2005, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended.
(5) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers refundable income
tax credits under the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act,
the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and
Development Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical Production Tax
Credit Act.
(6) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a nonrefundable
income tax credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in
section 77-27,236.
(7) There shall be allowed to corporate taxpayers a nonrefundable
income tax credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act, the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act, the School
Readiness Tax Credit Act, the Child Care Tax Credit Act, the Affordable
Housing Tax Credit Act, the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, the
-26-

LB509 LB509
2025 2025
Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the Nebraska Pregnancy Help
Act, the Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Support Act, the Opportunity Scholarships Act, and sections 77-27,238,
77-27,240, and 77-27,241.
Sec. 17. This act becomes operative for all taxable years beginning
or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2025, under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
Sec. 18. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 19. Original sections 77-2715.07, 77-2717, and 77-2734.03,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-27-